Utah statutes.
26-28-118.   Immunity.
(1)  A person that acts in accordance with this chapter or with the applicable
anatomical gift law of another state, or attempts in good faith to do so, is
not liable for the act in a civil action, criminal prosecution, or
administrative proceeding.
(2)  Neither the person making an anatomical gift nor the donor's estate is
liable for any injury or damage that results from the making or use of the
gift.
(3)  In determining whether an anatomical gift has been made, amended, or
revoked under this chapter, a person may rely upon representations of an
individual listed in Subsection 26-28-109(1)(b), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), or
(i) relating to the individual's relationship to the donor or prospective
donor unless the person knows that the representation is untrue.
